Montana, session 2025, SB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Adjustment to blindness program -- purpose. There is an adjustment to blindness
program established within the department of public health and human services. The purpose of the program is
to help consumers under age 55 who have severe visual impairments to achieve independent living goals.
Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 6], unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Consumer" means a person with a severe visual impairment who the department has
determined is eligible for independent living services.
(2) "Department" means the department of public health and human services provided for in 2-15-
2201.
(3) "Independent living" means control over one's life based on choices between acceptable
options in a manner that minimizes reliance on others for making decisions and for conducting the activities of
daily living.
(4) "Independent living goals" means a consumer's goals to achieve independent living.
(5) "Independent living services" means services and equipment provided by the department to
help consumers achieve their independent living goals.
(6) "Severe visual impairment" means a visual disability that, even with correction, remains so
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 82
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 82
severe that it makes daily tasks difficult to perform.
Section 3. Eligibility for services. The department shall determine whether a person is eligible for
independent living services based on criteria established by the department through administrative rule as
provided in [section 6].
Section 4. Services provided -- evaluation of consumer needs. (1) The department may provide
the following independent living services:
(a) outreach;
(b) services, training, and assistive technology to help consumers become more mobile and self-
sufficient;
(c) Braille instruction and other services and equipment to help consumers adjust to a severe
visual impairment;
(d) independent living skills training;
(e) peer counseling;
(f) guide services and reader services; and
(g) any other appropriate service designed to help consumers achieve their independent living
goals.
(2) The department shall evaluate each consumer to determine the independent living services
that may help the consumer achieve the consumer's independent living goals.
(3) To the extent that the department determines the program has funds available, the department
may provide or pay the cost of independent living services for a consumer. When determining the services to
be provided, the department shall consider the financial resources available to the consumer and the needs of
other consumers.
Section 5. Fair hearing. A person with a severe visual impairment who applies for or is receiving
independent living services under [sections 1 through 6] and is aggrieved by an action or inaction of the
department is entitled to a fair hearing in accordance with the rules adopted by the department as provided in
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 82
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 82
[section 6].
Section 6. Rulemaking authority. The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of
[sections 1 through 6].
Section 7. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 6] are intended to be codified as an integral
part of Title 53, chapter 7, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 7, apply to [sections 1 through 6].
Section 8. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 82
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 82, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 82
INTRODUCED BY M. YAKAWICH
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
AN ACT ESTABLISHING AN ADJUSTMENT TO BLINDNESS PROGRAM; PROVIDING FOR ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATIONS; PROVIDING FOR INDEPENDENT LIVING SERVICES AND FOR PAYMENT OF THE
SERVICES; PROVIDING FOR A RIGHT TO A FAIR HEARING; PROVIDING DEFINITIONS; PROVIDING
RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”